Washington statutes.
RCW 41.50.090

Department succeeds to and vested with transferred powers, duties, and functions—Boards to be kept informed—Approval of rules—Disability benefit applications.

(1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, on the effective date of transfer as provided in RCW 41.50.030, the department shall succeed to and is vested with all powers, duties, and functions now or by any concurrent act of this 1976 legislature vested in the individual retirement boards set forth in RCW 41.50.030 relating to the administration of their various retirement systems, including but not limited to the power to appoint a staff and define the duties thereof: PROVIDED, That actuarial services required by the department shall be performed by the state actuary as provided in RCW 44.44.040.

(2) The department shall keep each retirement board fully informed on the administration of the corresponding retirement system, and shall furnish any information requested by a retirement board.

(3) Rules proposed by the director under RCW 2.10.070, 41.50.055, 41.32.025, or 41.40.020 shall be submitted to the appropriate retirement boards for review prior to adoption. After receiving approval of the members of the appropriate board, such rules shall become effective as provided by the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW.

(4) Each retirement board shall continue to perform all functions as are vested in it by law with respect to applications for benefits paid upon either temporary or permanent disability, with such staff assistance from the department as may be required. The director shall perform those functions with respect to disability benefits as are vested in him or her by RCW 41.26.120, 41.26.125, and 41.26.200.

[ 1985 c 102 s 6; 1983 c 3 s 97; 1981 c 294 s 8; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 105 s 11.]

NOTES:

Purpose—Retrospective application—1985 c 102: See notes following RCW 41.26.120.

Severability—1981 c 294: See note following RCW 41.26.115.